Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1403.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-5401, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-5401. Workforce Arizona council; duties; annual report; definition A. The governor by executive order shall establish a workforce Arizona council and appoint members to the council consistent with 29 United States Code section 3111. B. The workforce Arizona council that is established by executive order shall assist the governor in: 1. The development, implementation and modification of a state workforce plan. 2. The review of statewide policies and programs. The workforce Arizona council shall make recommendations to the governor on actions that should be taken to align workforce development programs in a manner that supports a comprehensive and streamlined workforce development system. 3. The development and continuous improvement of the workforce development system in this state. 4. The development and the updating of comprehensive state performance accountability measures. 5. The identification and dissemination of information on workforce best practices. 6. The development and review of statewide policies affecting the coordinated provision of services through a one-stop delivery system. 7. The development of strategies for technology improvements to facilitate access to and improve the quality of services and activities provided through a one-stop delivery system. 8. The development of strategies for aligning technology and data systems across one-stop partner programs to enhance service delivery and improve efficiencies in reporting on performance accountability measurement and reporting processes and the incorporation of local input into the design and implementation of one-stop partner programs. 9. The development of allocation formulas for the distribution of monies for employment and training activities for adults and youth workforce investment activities. C. The workforce Arizona council shall meet at least four times each year and shall submit a written annual report to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the joint legislative budget committee by December 1 of each year.  This report shall include: 1. Information specifying the levels of performance achieved with respect to the primary indicators of performance of workforce development programs and performance with respect to individuals with barriers to employment disaggregated by race, ethnicity, sex and age. 2. The total number of participants who were served by workforce development programs. 3. The number of participants who received career and training services and the amount of monies spent on each type of service. 4. The number of participants who exited from career and training services. 5. The average cost per participant of those participants who received career and training services. 6. The percentage of participants who received training services and obtained employment in a field related to the training received. 7. The number of individuals with barriers to employment who were served by workforce development programs. 8. An analysis of workforce development outcomes in rural areas of this state, including participation levels, service availability, employment outcomes and barriers unique to those communities. D. Each state agency and community college shall submit to the workforce Arizona council the information necessary to compile the report described in subsection C, paragraph 3 of this section by November 1 of each year. E. The workforce Arizona council shall coordinate with state agencies and state community colleges to produce outcome-based performance measures for all state workforce development programs. F. For the purposes of this section, "Rural" means a county with a population of less than two hundred fifty thousand persons. END_STATUTE